Washington statutes.
RCW 2.44.050

Notice of change and substitution.

When an attorney is changed, as provided in RCW 2.44.040, written notice of the change, and of the substitution of a new attorney, or of the appearance of the party in person, must be given to the adverse party; until then, he or she shall be bound to recognize the former attorney.

[ 2011 c 336 s 61; Code 1881 s 3284; 1863 p 405 s 10; RRS s 134.]